Utah statutes.
70-3a-401.   Fraudulent registration.

(1)  A person is civilly liable to pay all damages resulting from a filing or registration under this chapter if:

(a)  that person procures the filing or registration of any mark:

(i)  for the person who procures the filing or registration; or

(ii)  on behalf of another person; and

(b)  the person who procures the filing or registration procures it by:

(i)  knowingly making a false or fraudulent representation or declaration, orally or in writing; or

(ii)  any other fraudulent means.

(2)  Damages sustained as a result of a filing or registration described in Subsection (1) may be recovered:

(a)  by or on behalf of the person injured by the filing or registration; and

(b)  in any court of competent jurisdiction.

